District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.21

Exempt property owners; BID membership.

The District government, the federal government, or any property owner owning exempt real property located in the BID, or adjacent to or abutting BID boundaries, may, at their sole discretion, contribute money to the BID. Such exempt real property owners who voluntarily make a payment to the BID in lieu of a BID tax shall be entitled to membership in the BID and services provided to the properties in the BID. Nothing in this subchapter shall either compel or prohibit such exempt real property owners from contributing BID taxes, becoming BID members, or receiving BID services.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 21, 43 DCR 1684
renumbered as § 22, Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-26, § 2, 44 DCR 4320
Feb 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(o), 61 DCR 10741
This section is referenced in § 2-1215.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-2291.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 added “or adjacent to or abutting BID boundaries” in the first sentence.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-23, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5762).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-89, June 19, 1997, 44 DCR 3747), and § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-146, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 5054).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(o) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(o) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735).

Expiration of Law 11-134

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1215.01.